src/morphology/hacks/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmilleoktiljoonille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kolmineoktiljoonine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmistaoktiljoonista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolminaoktiljoonina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmienoktiljoonien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiinoktiljooniin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmissaoktiljoonissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kolminoktiljoonin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmetoktiljoonat   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmiaoktiljoonia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmiksioktiljooniksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmettaoktiljoonatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeltaoktiljoonalta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmellaoktiljoonalla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmelleoktiljoonalle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmestaoktiljoonasta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolmenaoktiljoonana   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmenoktiljoonan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeenoktiljoonaan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmessaoktiljoonassa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmeoktiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmeaoktiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmeoktiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmeksioktiljoonaksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmittapiljardeitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiltapiljardeilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmillapiljardeilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmillepiljardeille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kolminepiljardeine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmistapiljardeista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolminapiljardeina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmienpiljardien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiinpiljardeiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmissapiljardeissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kolminpiljardein   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmetpiljardit   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmiapiljardeja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmiksipiljardeiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmettapiljarditta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeltapiljardilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmellapiljardilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmellepiljardille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmestapiljardista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolmenapiljardina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmenpiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeenpiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmessapiljardissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmepiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmeapiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljardia][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmeksipiljardiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmittapiljoonitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiltapiljoonilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmillapiljoonilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmillepiljoonille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kolminepiljoonine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmistapiljoonista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolminapiljoonina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmienpiljoonien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiinpiljooniin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmissapiljoonissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kolminpiljoonin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmetpiljoonat   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmiapiljoonia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmiksipiljooniksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmettapiljoonatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeltapiljoonalta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmellapiljoonalla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmellepiljoonalle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmestapiljoonasta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolmenapiljoonana   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmenpiljoonan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeenpiljoonaan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmessapiljoonassa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmepiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmeapiljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmepiljoonaa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmeksipiljoonaksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmittasadoitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiltasadoilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmillasadoilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmillesadoille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0kolminesatoine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0kolmistasadoista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0kolminasatoina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0kolmiensatojen   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmiinsatoihin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmissasadoissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0kolminsadoin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0kolmetsadat   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0kolmiasatoja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0kolmiksisadoiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmettasadatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmeltasadalta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0kolmellasadalla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=kolmesataa][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=CARD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0kolmellesadalle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
